test/src/morphology/N-С_Д-вино_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - вино M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      вино+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: вино́
      вино+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: вино́
      вино+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: вина́
      вино+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: вине́
      вино+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: вину́
      вино+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: вино́м
      вино+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: ви́на
      вино+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: ви́на
      вино+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: ви́н
      вино+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: ви́нах
      вино+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: ви́нам
      вино+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: ви́нами
